Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70.48.140 and 1977 ex.s. c 316 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person having charge of a jail ((shall))may choose to receive and keep in such jail, when room is available, all persons confined or committed thereto by process or order issued under authority of the United States until discharged according to law, the same as if such persons had been committed under process issued under authority of the state((, if provision is made by the United States for the support of such persons confined, and for any additional personnel required)). Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an agreement shall be made by contract with the United States to confine or commit individuals in a jail prior to the jail accepting any person in federal custody.(2) If a person in federal custody is presented to a jail prior to entry of any contract required under this section, the jail may in its discretion confine or commit the individual. Beginning 180 days following the jail's acceptance of the first person in federal custody for confinement or committal to the jail after the effective date of this act, the jail may not accept any new person in federal custody for confinement or committal except as provided pursuant to a contract with the federal government. The jail may continue to accept any person in federal custody for confinement or committal during this 180-day period.(3) Any contract with the federal government for the acceptance of persons in federal custody shall include a fee that is a rate not less than the daily bed rate established by interlocal agreement pursuant to RCW 39.34.180.(4) Nothing in this act shall be interpreted to prevent a jail from accepting a person in federal custody for confinement or commitment if the jail, in its sole discretion, determines that there is a reasonable public safety interest in accepting such person for confinement or commitment.--- END ---